Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2629
Insurance consultant; obligation.

A consultant is obligated, under his or her license, to serve with objectivity and complete loyalty the interests of his or her client and to render his or her client such information, counsel, and service as within the knowledge, understanding, and opinion, in good faith of the licensee, best serves the client's insurance needs and interest.

Laws 1980, LB 481, § 24.